Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Chapter 7. Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act.
§ 55.1-711.
Change in circumstances.

If information disclosed in accordance with this chapter is subsequently rendered or discovered to be inaccurate as a result of any act, occurrence, information received, circumstance, or agreement subsequent to the delivery of the required disclosures, the inaccuracy resulting therefrom does not constitute a violation of this chapter. However, at or before settlement, the owner shall be required to disclose any material change in the disclosures made relative to the property. If, at the time the disclosures are required to be made, an item of information required to be disclosed is unknown or not available to the owner, the owner may state that the information is unknown or may use an approximation of the information, provided that the approximation is clearly identified as such, is reasonable, is based on the actual knowledge of the owner, and is not used for the purpose of circumventing or evading this chapter.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-522; 2007, c. 265; 2014, c. 386; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-712.
Duties of real estate licensees.

A real estate licensee representing an owner of residential real property as the listing broker has a duty to inform each such owner represented by that licensee of the owner’s rights and obligations under this chapter. A real estate licensee representing a purchaser of residential real property or, if the purchaser is not represented by a licensee, the real estate licensee representing an owner of residential real estate and dealing with the purchaser has a duty to inform each such purchaser of the purchaser’s rights and obligations under this chapter. Provided that a real estate licensee performs those duties, the licensee shall have no further duties to the parties to a residential real estate transaction under this chapter and shall not be liable to any party to a residential real estate transaction for a violation of this chapter or for any failure to disclose any information regarding any real property subject to this chapter.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-523; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases cited below were decided under prior law.

Inconsistent disclosure statements. —

In a case in which the home buyers sued a real estate agent for fraud in the inducement because the results of the testing for radon gas in the basement had not been disclosed, the agent argued unsuccessfully that her compliance with § 55-523 barred the buyers from asserting a viable fraud claim. The seller and the agent signed a radon acknowledgment form stating that they had no knowledge concerning the testing of the property for radon or the presence or absence of radon in the property; however, that was inconsistent with the disclosure statement in which the seller and the agent stated that the property had been tested for radon gas, and that failure to accurately inform the buyers prevented the agent from obtaining the protection of the statute. Nathan v. Long & Foster Real Estate, Inc., 82 Va. Cir. 613, 2009 Va. Cir. LEXIS 135 (Roanoke Nov. 20, 2009).

Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act provides a cause of action against real estate licensees. —

Attorneys’ demurrer to a purchaser’s legal malpractice action alleging that they failed to pursue her claim under the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act (VRPDA), § 55-517 et seq., against realtors was overruled because not only did the VRPDA provide a cause of action against real estate licensees, § 55-523, the purchaser’s complaint stated such a cause of action by alleging that the realtors did not advise her of her rights and obligations under the VRPDA; the complaint suggested that the attorneys failed to identify and take action against a potential defendant in what would be a valid underlying suit against the realtors, and the purchaser thereby forfeited any claim she had under the VRPDA against the realtors. McGlen v. Rosenfeld, 82 Va. Cir. 108, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 3 (Fairfax County Jan. 13, 2011).

§ 55.1-713.
Actions under this chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other statute or regulation, no cause of action shall arise against an owner or a real estate licensee for failure to disclose that the real property was the site of:

An act or occurrence that had no effect on the physical structure of the real property, its physical environment, or the improvements located thereon; or

A homicide, felony, or suicide.

The purchaser’s remedies for failure of an owner to comply with the provisions of this chapter are as follows:

If the owner fails to provide any of the applicable disclosures required by this chapter, the contract may be terminated subject to the provisions of subsection B of §

55.1-709

.

In the event that the owner fails to provide any of the applicable disclosures required by this chapter, or the owner misrepresents, willfully or otherwise, the information required in such disclosure, except as result of information provided by an officer or employee of the locality in which the property is located, the purchaser may maintain an action to recover his actual damages suffered as the result of such violation. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, no purchaser of residential real property located in a noise zone designated on the official zoning map of the locality as having a day-night average sound level of less than 65 decibels shall have a right to maintain an action for damages pursuant to this section.

Any action brought under this section shall be commenced within one year of the date the purchaser received the applicable disclosures required by this chapter. If the disclosures required by this chapter were not delivered to the purchaser, an action shall be commenced within one year of the date of settlement, if by sale, or occupancy, if by lease with an option to purchase.Nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent a purchaser from pursuing any remedies at law or equity otherwise available against an owner in the event of an owner’s intentional or willful misrepresentation of the condition of the subject property.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-524; 1993, c. 847; 2005, c. 510; 2007, c. 265; 2017, c. 386; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases cited below were decided under prior law.

Limitation of actions. —

Buyer could not maintain a direct claim under the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act, subsection C of § 55-524, against the sellers for allegedly failing to make certain disclosures to the buyer in a disclaimer statement that the sellers gave to the buyer of residential property that contained numerous building restrictions, as the buyer did not bring an action within one year of the time in which the buyer allegedly did not receive the proper disclosures. However, the buyer could maintain an action against the seller’s agents for claims brought ex contractu or ex delicto against them, as the buyer’s action was filed against them well within the one-year statute of limitation for personal injury, §

8.01-243

, and contracts, governed by §

8.01-246

, running from the settlement date regarding the relevant real estate transaction. McGlen v. Barrett, 78 Va. Cir. 90, 2009 Va. Cir. LEXIS 6 (Fairfax County Jan. 9, 2009).

Defects not limited to those listed in the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act. —

Actionable “defects” under the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act (VRPDA) are not limited to those defects that were set out in the VRPDA, because the listed defects relate to known defects to be disclosed, and they do not relate to disclaimer statements; section 55-519 states that the disclosure form may include the listed defects but does not indicate the exclusivity of the list, and because the VRPDA does not otherwise define “defects,” the list of potential “defects” in § 55-519 does not constrain the use of the term “defects.” McGlen v. Rosenfeld, 82 Va. Cir. 108, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 3 (Fairfax County Jan. 13, 2011).

Failure to provide notice of defect. —

Attorneys’ demurrer to a purchaser’s action alleging that their failure to file her suit against sellers within the one-year limitations period of the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act (VRPDA) was a breach of an implied obligation to perform legal services was overruled as to the purchaser’s claim that the sellers’ failure to provide notice of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (CBPA) was a defect because a damages action based on the failure to provide notice of the CBPA was a remedy under the VRPDA as it existed on the date of contracting. McGlen v. Rosenfeld, 82 Va. Cir. 108, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 3 (Fairfax County Jan. 13, 2011).

Attorneys’ demurrer to a purchaser’s action alleging that the failure to file suit against sellers within the one-year limitations period of subsection C of § 55-524 was a breach of an implied obligation to perform legal services, was sustained because there was no negligence on the part of the attorneys for failing to timely file the complaint in the underlying suit; the purpose of residential disclosure or disclaimer requirements in the Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act, §§ 55-519 and 55-519.1, is to provide protection to purchasers of residential property against issues as to the property being sold that are not readily apparent but may exist, and a failure to provide a “disclaimer,” which puts the purchaser on notice of one of the specified potential issues, does not serve the contemplated purpose of the Act, and it is therefore not a “disclaimer” for purposes of starting the one-year statute. McGlen v. Rosenfeld, 82 Va. Cir. 108, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 3 (Fairfax County Jan. 13, 2011).

§ 55.1-714.
Real Estate Board to develop form; when effective.

An owner shall be required to make disclosures required by this chapter for real property subject to a real estate purchase contract that is fully executed by all parties. The Real Estate Board shall develop the form for signature by the parties stating that the purchaser has been advised of the disclosures listed in the residential property disclosure statement located on the Board’s website in accordance with §

54.1-2105.1

. The Board may at any time amend the residential property disclosure statement and the form for signature by the parties as the Board deems necessary and appropriate.

History.

1992, c. 717, § 55-525; 1993, c. 848; 2007, c. 265; 2018, cc. 60, 86; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 749.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 749, in the second sentence, substituted “stating that the purchaser has been advised of the disclosures listed in the” for “advising the purchaser to review the” and inserted “located.”